Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.090

Limited assistance by former state officers and employees.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

This chapter shall not be construed to prevent a former state officer or state employee from rendering assistance to others if the assistance is provided without compensation in any form and is limited to one or more of the following:

(1) Providing the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of state agencies or state employees;

(2) Providing free transportation to another for the purpose of conducting business with a state agency;

(3) Assisting a natural person or nonprofit corporation in obtaining or completing application forms or other forms required by a state agency for the conduct of a state business; or

(4) Providing assistance to the poor and infirm.

[ 1994 c 154 s 109.]